Utah statutes.
41-22-19.   Deposit of fees and related money in Off-highway Vehicle Account
-- Use for facilities, costs and expenses of division, and education --
Request for matching funds.
(1)  Except as provided under Subsection (3) and Sections 41-22-34 and
41-22-36, all registration fees and related money collected by the Motor
Vehicle Division or any agencies designated to act for the Motor Vehicle
Division under this chapter shall be deposited as restricted revenue in the
Off-highway Vehicle Account in the General Fund less the costs of collecting
off-highway vehicle registration fees by the Motor Vehicle Division.  The
balance of the money may be used by the division as follows:
(a)  for the construction, improvement, operation, or maintenance of publicly
owned or administered off-highway vehicle facilities;
(b)  for the mitigation of impacts associated with off-highway vehicle use;
(c)  as grants or as matching funds with any federal agency, state agency,
political subdivision of the state, or organized user group for the
construction, improvement, operation, acquisition, or maintenance of publicly
owned or administered off-highway vehicle facilities including public access
facilities;
(d)  for the administration and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter;
and
(e)  for the education of off-highway vehicle users.
(2)  All agencies or political subdivisions requesting matching funds shall
submit plans for proposed off-highway vehicle facilities to the division for
review and approval.
(3) (a)  One dollar and 50 cents of each annual registration fee collected
under Subsection 41-22-8(1) and each off-highway vehicle user fee collected
under Subsection 41-22-35(2) shall be deposited in the Land Grant Management
Fund created under Section 53C-3-101.
(b)  The Utah School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration shall use
the money deposited under Subsection (3)(a) for costs associated with off-
highway vehicle use of legally accessible lands within its jurisdiction as
follows:
(i)  to improve recreational opportunities on trust lands by constructing,
improving, maintaining, or perfecting access for off-highway vehicle trails;
and
(ii)  to mitigate impacts associated with off-highway vehicle use.
(c)  Any unused balance of the money deposited under Subsection (3)(a)
exceeding $350,000 at the end of each fiscal year shall be deposited in the
Off-highway Vehicle Account under Subsection (1).
